Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 37
FARM PRODUCTS

35-37-101 to 35-37-122 (Repealed).

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article repealed, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 753, § 3, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This article 37 was added with relocations in 2017. For amendments to this article 37 prior to its repeal in 2020, consult the 2019 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. This article 37 was relocated to article 36 of this title 35. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 37, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.